Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.131

Specialty electrical contractor license—Written warning, penalty—Violations of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361—Schedule of penalties—Appeal.

Until July 1, 2007, the department shall issue a written warning to any specialty contractor, performing the scope of work defined by rule for the pump and irrigation or domestic pump specialties, not having a valid electrical contractor license. The warning will state that the contractor must be qualified for and apply for a specialty electrical contractor license under the requirements in RCW 19.28.041 within thirty calendar days of the warning. Only one warning will be issued to any contractor. If the contractor fails to comply with this section, the department shall issue a penalty or penalties as authorized in this section to the contractor. Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 shall be assessed a penalty of not less than fifty dollars or more than ten thousand dollars. The department shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.141 and 19.28.311 through 19.28.361 of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed sent to the last known address of the assessed party. Any penalty is subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed, sent to the last known address of the assessed party and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars or ten percent of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than one hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

[ 2014 c 190 s 2; 2011 c 301 s 6; 2006 c 185 s 13; 2001 c 211 s 8; 1996 c 147 s 7; 1988 c 81 s 12; 1986 c 156 s 11; 1983 c 206 s 12; 1980 c 30 s 16; 1935 c 169 s 14; RRS s 8307-14. Formerly RCW 19.28.350.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 190: "This act takes effect July 1, 2015." [ 2014 c 190 s 6.]